Nebraska, session 109, LB548.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) The Legislature declares that the purpose of this section
is to allow certain cities and villages that own and operate natural gas
systems to engage in tax-exempt natural gas supply transactions as described in
section 148(b)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code and 26 C.F.R. 1.148-1(e)(2)
(iii), as such section and regulation existed on January 1, 2024, that benefit
the cities and villages and their taxpayers as well as the counterparty to the
transactions and the people of Nebraska by incentivizing private investment and
economic development.
(2) On or before January 1, 2027, any city of the first or second class or
village which owns and operates a natural gas system may enter into a contract
to sell natural gas to any industrial consumer of natural gas whose facilities
are located in the State of Nebraska, are within one hundred miles of such city
or village, and, at the time the parties enter into the transaction, require at
least three billion British thermal units of natural gas per day based on an
annual average. The contract term shall be for at least two years and may
include renewal and extension terms. At the time the parties enter into the
contract, the industrial consumer shall not be a consumer of any competitive
natural gas provider. The contract shall provide for the consumer to receive
natural gas, directly or indirectly, through a competitive natural gas provider
registered in Nebraska. Prior to entering into a contract with an industrial
consumer, the city council or village board of trustees shall adopt a
resolution stating that the contract does not pose an unreasonable financial
risk to the city or village or its taxpayers. Such industrial consumer shall
not, within five years prior to the contract's execution, have received gas
service from any investor-owned or governmentally owned gas system. The
consumer's facilities shall be considered within the service area of the
natural gas distribution system of the city or village.
-1-